Massachusetts, session 194th, H3647.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 4 of chapter 6C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after subsection (b) the following subsection:-
(b½) All expenditures for maintaining, repairing, improving, and constructing
municipal ways and bridges, and other eligible municipal projects, made by the department in
accordance with subsection (b), shall be allocated by the commissioner based upon the following
formula:
Population………………………………………15.333%
Road Mileage…………………………………....69.334%
Employment……………………………………..15.333%.
of 1